Missouri, session 2026, SB1202.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Sections 137.010, 137.080, and 137.115, RSMo,
2 are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
3 be known as sections 137.010, 137.080, and 137.115, to read as
4 follows:
1 137.010. The following words, terms and phrases when
2 used in laws governing taxation and revenue in the state of
3 Missouri shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this
4 section, except when the context clearly indicates a
5 different meaning:
6 (1) "Grain and other agricultural crops in an
7 unmanufactured condition" shall mean grains and feeds
8 including, but not limited to, soybeans, cow peas, wheat,
9 corn, oats, barley, kafir, rye, flax, grain sorghums,
10 cotton, and such other products as are usually stored in
11 grain and other elevators and on farms; but excluding such
12 grains and other agricultural crops after being processed
13 into products of such processing, when packaged or sacked.
14 The term "processing" shall not include hulling, cleaning,
15 drying, grating, or polishing;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1202 2
16 (2) "Hydroelectric power generating equipment", very-
17 low-head turbine generators with a nameplate generating
18 capacity of at least four hundred kilowatts but not more
19 than six hundred kilowatts and machinery and equipment used
20 directly in the production, generation, conversion, storage,
21 or conveyance of hydroelectric power to land-based devices
22 and appurtenances used in the transmission of electrical
23 energy;
24 (3) "Intangible personal property", for the purpose of
25 taxation, shall include all property other than real
26 property and tangible personal property, as defined by this
27 section;
28 (4) "Real property" includes land itself, whether laid
29 out in town lots or otherwise, and all growing crops,
30 buildings, structures, improvements and fixtures of whatever
31 kind thereon, hydroelectric power generating equipment, the
32 installed poles used in the transmission or reception of
33 electrical energy, audio signals, video signals or similar
34 purposes, provided the owner of such installed poles is also
35 an owner of a fee simple interest, possessor of an easement,
36 holder of a license or franchise, or is the beneficiary of a
37 right-of-way dedicated for public utility purposes for the
38 underlying land; attached wires, transformers, amplifiers,
39 substations, and other such devices and appurtenances used
40 in the transmission or reception of electrical energy, audio
41 signals, video signals or similar purposes when owned by the
42 owner of the installed poles, otherwise such items are
43 considered personal property; and stationary property used
44 for transportation or storage of liquid and gaseous
45 products, including, but not limited to, petroleum products,
46 natural gas, propane or LP gas equipment, water, and sewage;

SB 1202 3
47 (5) "Reliever airport", any land and improvements,
48 exclusive of structures, on privately owned airports that
49 qualify as reliever airports under the National Plan of
50 Integrated Airport Systems that may receive federal airport
51 improvement project funds through the Federal Aviation
52 Administration;
53 (6) "Tangible personal property" includes every
54 tangible thing being the subject of ownership or part
55 ownership whether animate or inanimate, other than money,
56 and not forming part or parcel of real property as herein
57 defined, but does not include household goods, furniture,
58 wearing apparel and articles of personal use and adornment,
59 as defined by the state tax commission, owned and used by a
60 person in his home or dwelling place. Tangible personal
61 property shall include:
62 (a) Solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and
63 related solar equipment, components, materials, and supplies
64 installed in connection with solar photovoltaic energy
65 systems, as described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of
66 section 144.030, that were constructed and producing solar
67 energy prior to August 9, 2022; and
68 (b) Machinery and equipment used to provide broadband
69 communications service. Machinery and equipment used to
70 provide broadband communications service shall include, but
71 not be limited to, wires, cables, fiber, conduits, antennas,
72 poles, switches, routers, amplifiers, rectifiers, repeaters,
73 receivers, multiplexers, duplexers, transmitters, circuit
74 cards, insulating and protective materials and cases, power
75 equipment, backup power equipment, diagnostic equipment,
76 storage devices, customer-premise equipment, modems,
77 software, cable-modem-termination-system components, Wi-Fi
78 equipment, and other general central-office, headend, or hub

SB 1202 4
79 equipment such as channel cards, frames, and cabinets, and
80 any successor-technology items used to monitor, test,
81 maintain, enable, or facilitate qualifying equipment,
82 machinery, ancillary components, appurtenances, accessories,
83 or other infrastructure used in whole or in part to provide
84 broadband communications service.
1 137.080. Real estate and tangible personal property
2 shall be assessed annually at the assessment which commences
3 on the first day of January. For purposes of assessing and
4 taxing tangible personal property, all tangible personal
5 property shall be divided into the following subclasses:
6 (1) Grain and other agricultural crops in an
7 unmanufactured condition;
8 (2) Livestock;
9 (3) Farm machinery;
10 (4) Vehicles, including recreational vehicles, but not
11 including manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010,
12 which are actually used as dwelling units;
13 (5) Manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010,
14 which are actually used as dwelling units;
15 (6) Motor vehicles which are eligible for registration
16 and are registered as historic motor vehicles under section
17 301.131;
18 (7) Solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and
19 related solar equipment, components, materials, and supplies
20 installed in connection with solar photovoltaic energy
21 systems, as described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of
22 section 144.030, that were constructed and producing solar
23 energy prior to August 9, 2022; [and]
24 (8) Machinery and equipment used to provide broadband
25 communications service and that is placed in service prior
26 to August 28, 2026; and

SB 1202 5
27 (9) All taxable tangible personal property not
28 included in [subclass (1), subclass (2), subclass (3),
29 subclass (4), subclass (5), subclass (6), or subclass (7)]
30 subclasses (1) to (8).
1 137.115. 1. All other laws to the contrary
2 notwithstanding, the assessor or the assessor's deputies in
3 all counties of this state including the City of St. Louis
4 shall annually make a list of all real and tangible personal
5 property taxable in the assessor's city, county, town or
6 district. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of
7 this section and section 137.078, the assessor shall
8 annually assess all personal property at thirty-three and
9 one-third percent of its true value in money as of January
10 first of each calendar year. The assessor shall annually
11 assess all real property, including any new construction and
12 improvements to real property, and possessory interests in
13 real property at the percent of its true value in money set
14 in subsection 5 of this section. The true value in money of
15 any possessory interest in real property in subclass (3),
16 where such real property is on or lies within the ultimate
17 airport boundary as shown by a federal airport layout plan,
18 as defined by 14 CFR 151.5, of a commercial airport having a
19 FAR Part 139 certification and owned by a political
20 subdivision, shall be the otherwise applicable true value in
21 money of any such possessory interest in real property, less
22 the total dollar amount of costs paid by a party, other than
23 the political subdivision, towards any new construction or
24 improvements on such real property completed after January
25 1, 2008, and which are included in the above-mentioned
26 possessory interest, regardless of the year in which such
27 costs were incurred or whether such costs were considered in
28 any prior year. The assessor shall annually assess all real

SB 1202 6
29 property in the following manner: new assessed values shall
30 be determined as of January first of each odd-numbered year
31 and shall be entered in the assessor's books; those same
32 assessed values shall apply in the following even-numbered
33 year, except for new construction and property improvements
34 which shall be valued as though they had been completed as
35 of January first of the preceding odd-numbered year. The
36 assessor may call at the office, place of doing business, or
37 residence of each person required by this chapter to list
38 property, and require the person to make a correct statement
39 of all taxable tangible personal property owned by the
40 person or under his or her care, charge or management,
41 taxable in the county. On or before January first of each
42 even-numbered year, the assessor shall prepare and submit a
43 two-year assessment maintenance plan to the county governing
44 body and the state tax commission for their respective
45 approval or modification. The county governing body shall
46 approve and forward such plan or its alternative to the plan
47 to the state tax commission by February first. If the
48 county governing body fails to forward the plan or its
49 alternative to the plan to the state tax commission by
50 February first, the assessor's plan shall be considered
51 approved by the county governing body. If the state tax
52 commission fails to approve a plan and if the state tax
53 commission and the assessor and the governing body of the
54 county involved are unable to resolve the differences, in
55 order to receive state cost-share funds outlined in section
56 137.750, the county or the assessor shall petition the
57 administrative hearing commission, by May first, to decide
58 all matters in dispute regarding the assessment maintenance
59 plan. Upon agreement of the parties, the matter may be
60 stayed while the parties proceed with mediation or

SB 1202 7
61 arbitration upon terms agreed to by the parties. The final
62 decision of the administrative hearing commission shall be
63 subject to judicial review in the circuit court of the
64 county involved. In the event a valuation of subclass (1)
65 real property within any county with a charter form of
66 government, or within a city not within a county, is made by
67 a computer, computer-assisted method or a computer program,
68 the burden of proof, supported by clear, convincing and
69 cogent evidence to sustain such valuation, shall be on the
70 assessor at any hearing or appeal. In any such county,
71 unless the assessor proves otherwise, there shall be a
72 presumption that the assessment was made by a computer,
73 computer-assisted method or a computer program. Such
74 evidence shall include, but shall not be limited to, the
75 following:
76 (1) The findings of the assessor based on an appraisal
77 of the property by generally accepted appraisal techniques;
78 and
79 (2) The purchase prices from sales of at least three
80 comparable properties and the address or location thereof.
81 As used in this subdivision, the word "comparable" means
82 that:
83 (a) Such sale was closed at a date relevant to the
84 property valuation; and
85 (b) Such properties are not more than one mile from
86 the site of the disputed property, except where no similar
87 properties exist within one mile of the disputed property,
88 the nearest comparable property shall be used. Such
89 property shall be within five hundred square feet in size of
90 the disputed property, and resemble the disputed property in
91 age, floor plan, number of rooms, and other relevant
92 characteristics.

SB 1202 8
93 2. Assessors in each county of this state and the City
94 of St. Louis may send personal property assessment forms
95 through the mail.
96 3. The following items of personal property shall each
97 constitute separate subclasses of tangible personal property
98 and shall be assessed and valued for the purposes of
99 taxation at the following percentages of their true value in
100 money:
101 (1) Grain and other agricultural crops in an
102 unmanufactured condition, one-half of one percent;
103 (2) Livestock, twelve percent;
104 (3) Farm machinery, twelve percent;
105 (4) Motor vehicles which are eligible for registration
106 as and are registered as historic motor vehicles pursuant to
107 section 301.131 and aircraft which are at least twenty-five
108 years old and which are used solely for noncommercial
109 purposes and are operated less than two hundred hours per
110 year or aircraft that are home built from a kit, five
111 percent;
112 (5) Poultry, twelve percent;
113 (6) Tools and equipment used for pollution control and
114 tools and equipment used in retooling for the purpose of
115 introducing new product lines or used for making
116 improvements to existing products by any company which is
117 located in a state enterprise zone and which is identified
118 by any standard industrial classification number cited in
119 subdivision (7) of section 135.200, twenty-five percent;
120 [and]
121 (7) Solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and
122 related solar equipment, components, materials, and supplies
123 installed in connection with solar photovoltaic energy
124 systems, as described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of

SB 1202 9
125 section 144.030, that were constructed and producing solar
126 energy prior to August 9, 2022, five percent; and
127 (8) (a) Machinery and equipment that is used to
128 provide broadband communications service and that is placed
129 in service on or after August 28, 2026, twelve percent for
130 all calendar years beginning on or after January 1, 2027,
131 and ending on or before December 31, 2033;
132 (b) Machinery and equipment that is used to provide
133 broadband communications service and that is placed in
134 service on or after August 28, 2026, thirty-three and one-
135 third percent for all calendar years beginning on or after
136 January 1, 2034.
137 4. The person listing the property shall enter a true
138 and correct statement of the property, in a printed blank
139 prepared for that purpose. The statement, after being
140 filled out, shall be signed and either affirmed or sworn to
141 as provided in section 137.155. The list shall then be
142 delivered to the assessor.
143 5. (1) All subclasses of real property, as such
144 subclasses are established in Section 4(b) of Article X of
145 the Missouri Constitution and defined in section 137.016,
146 shall be assessed at the following percentages of true value:
147 (a) For real property in subclass (1), nineteen
148 percent;
149 (b) For real property in subclass (2), twelve percent;
150 and
151 (c) For real property in subclass (3), thirty-two
152 percent.
153 (2) A taxpayer may apply to the county assessor, or,
154 if not located within a county, then the assessor of such
155 city, for the reclassification of such taxpayer's real
156 property if the use or purpose of such real property is

SB 1202 10
157 changed after such property is assessed under the provisions
158 of this chapter. If the assessor determines that such
159 property shall be reclassified, he or she shall determine
160 the assessment under this subsection based on the percentage
161 of the tax year that such property was classified in each
162 subclassification.
163 6. Manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010,
164 which are actually used as dwelling units shall be assessed
165 at the same percentage of true value as residential real
166 property for the purpose of taxation. The percentage of
167 assessment of true value for such manufactured homes shall
168 be the same as for residential real property. If the county
169 collector cannot identify or find the manufactured home when
170 attempting to attach the manufactured home for payment of
171 taxes owed by the manufactured home owner, the county
172 collector may request the county commission to have the
173 manufactured home removed from the tax books, and such
174 request shall be granted within thirty days after the
175 request is made; however, the removal from the tax books
176 does not remove the tax lien on the manufactured home if it
177 is later identified or found. For purposes of this section,
178 a manufactured home located in a manufactured home rental
179 park, rental community or on real estate not owned by the
180 manufactured home owner shall be considered personal
181 property. For purposes of this section, a manufactured home
182 located on real estate owned by the manufactured home owner
183 may be considered real property.
184 7. Each manufactured home assessed shall be considered
185 a parcel for the purpose of reimbursement pursuant to
186 section 137.750, unless the manufactured home is deemed to
187 be real estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015

SB 1202 11
188 and assessed as a realty improvement to the existing real
189 estate parcel.
190 8. Any amount of tax due and owing based on the
191 assessment of a manufactured home shall be included on the
192 personal property tax statement of the manufactured home
193 owner unless the manufactured home is deemed to be real
194 estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015, in
195 which case the amount of tax due and owing on the assessment
196 of the manufactured home as a realty improvement to the
197 existing real estate parcel shall be included on the real
198 property tax statement of the real estate owner.
199 9. The assessor of each county and each city not
200 within a county shall use a nationally recognized automotive
201 trade publication such as the National Automobile Dealers'
202 Association Official Used Car Guide, Kelley Blue Book,
203 Edmunds, or other similar publication as the recommended
204 guide of information for determining the true value of motor
205 vehicles described in such publication. The state tax
206 commission shall select and make available to all assessors
207 which publication shall be used. The assessor of each
208 county and each city not within a county shall use the trade-
209 in value published in the current October issue of the
210 publication selected by the state tax commission. The
211 assessor shall not use a value that is greater than the
212 average trade-in value in determining the true value of the
213 motor vehicle without performing a physical inspection of
214 the motor vehicle. For vehicles two years old or newer from
215 a vehicle's model year, the assessor may use a value other
216 than average without performing a physical inspection of the
217 motor vehicle. In the absence of a listing for a particular
218 motor vehicle in such publication, the assessor shall use
219 such information or publications that, in the assessor's

SB 1202 12
220 judgment, will fairly estimate the true value in money of
221 the motor vehicle. For motor vehicles with a true value of
222 less than fifty thousand dollars as of January 1, 2025, the
223 assessor shall not assess such motor vehicle for an amount
224 greater than such motor vehicle was assessed in the previous
225 year, provided that such motor vehicle was properly assessed
226 in the previous year.
227 10. Before the assessor may increase the assessed
228 valuation of any parcel of subclass (1) real property by
229 more than fifteen percent since the last assessment,
230 excluding increases due to new construction or improvements,
231 the assessor shall conduct a physical inspection of such
232 property.
233 11. If a physical inspection is required, pursuant to
234 subsection 10 of this section, the assessor shall notify the
235 property owner of that fact in writing and shall provide the
236 owner clear written notice of the owner's rights relating to
237 the physical inspection. If a physical inspection is
238 required, the property owner may request that an interior
239 inspection be performed during the physical inspection. The
240 owner shall have no less than thirty days to notify the
241 assessor of a request for an interior physical inspection.
242 12. A physical inspection, as required by subsection
243 10 of this section, shall include, but not be limited to, an
244 on-site personal observation and review of all exterior
245 portions of the land and any buildings and improvements to
246 which the inspector has or may reasonably and lawfully gain
247 external access, and shall include an observation and review
248 of the interior of any buildings or improvements on the
249 property upon the timely request of the owner pursuant to
250 subsection 11 of this section. Mere observation of the
251 property via a drive-by inspection or the like shall not be

SB 1202 13
252 considered sufficient to constitute a physical inspection as
253 required by this section.
254 13. A county or city collector may accept credit cards
255 as proper form of payment of outstanding property tax or
256 license due. No county or city collector may charge
257 surcharge for payment by credit card which exceeds the fee
258 or surcharge charged by the credit card bank, processor, or
259 issuer for its service. A county or city collector may
260 accept payment by electronic transfers of funds in payment
261 of any tax or license and charge the person making such
262 payment a fee equal to the fee charged the county by the
263 bank, processor, or issuer of such electronic payment.
264 14. Any county or city not within a county in this
265 state may, by an affirmative vote of the governing body of
266 such county, opt out of the provisions of this section and
267 sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house
268 bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general assembly, second
269 regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house
270 committee substitute for senate substitute for senate
271 committee substitute for senate bill no. 960, ninety-second
272 general assembly, second regular session, for the next year
273 of the general reassessment, prior to January first of any
274 year. No county or city not within a county shall exercise
275 this opt-out provision after implementing the provisions of
276 this section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as
277 enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
278 assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as
279 modified by house committee substitute for senate substitute
280 for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960,
281 ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, in a
282 year of general reassessment. For the purposes of applying
283 the provisions of this subsection, a political subdivision

SB 1202 14
284 contained within two or more counties where at least one of
285 such counties has opted out and at least one of such
286 counties has not opted out shall calculate a single tax rate
287 as in effect prior to the enactment of house bill no. 1150
288 of the ninety-first general assembly, second regular
289 session. A governing body of a city not within a county or
290 a county that has opted out under the provisions of this
291 subsection may choose to implement the provisions of this
292 section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as
293 enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
294 assembly, second regular session, and section 137.073 as
295 modified by house committee substitute for senate substitute
296 for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960,
297 ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, for
298 the next year of general reassessment, by an affirmative
299 vote of the governing body prior to December thirty-first of
300 any year.
301 15. The governing body of any city of the third
302 classification with more than twenty-six thousand three
303 hundred but fewer than twenty-six thousand seven hundred
304 inhabitants located in any county that has exercised its
305 authority to opt out under subsection 14 of this section may
306 levy separate and differing tax rates for real and personal
307 property only if such city bills and collects its own
308 property taxes or satisfies the entire cost of the billing
309 and collection of such separate and differing tax rates.
310 Such separate and differing rates shall not exceed such
311 city's tax rate ceiling.
312 16. Any portion of real property that is available as
313 reserve for strip, surface, or coal mining for minerals for
314 purposes of excavation for future use or sale to others that
315 has not been bonded and permitted under chapter 444 shall be

SB 1202 15
316 assessed based upon how the real property is currently being
317 used. Any information provided to a county assessor, state
318 tax commission, state agency, or political subdivision
319 responsible for the administration of tax policies shall, in
320 the performance of its duties, make available all books,
321 records, and information requested, except such books,
322 records, and information as are by law declared confidential
323 in nature, including individually identifiable information
324 regarding a specific taxpayer or taxpayer's mine property.
325 For purposes of this subsection, "mine property" shall mean
326 all real property that is in use or readily available as a
327 reserve for strip, surface, or coal mining for minerals for
328 purposes of excavation for current or future use or sale to
329 others that has been bonded and permitted under chapter 444.
✓